Vermont, session 2025-2026, H252.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 28 V.S.A. § 818 is amended to read:
§ 818. EARNED TIME; REDUCTION OF TERM
(a) On or before September 1, 2020, the Department of Corrections shall
file a proposed rule pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 implementing an earned
time program to become effective on January 1, 2021. The Commissioner
shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section as an emergency
rule and concurrently propose them as a permanent rule. The emergency rule
shall be deemed to meet the standard for the adoption of emergency rules
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 844(a).
(b) The earned time program implemented pursuant to this section shall
comply with the following standards:
(1) The program shall be available for all sentenced offenders, including
furloughed offenders, provided that the program shall not be available to
VT LEG #380623 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.252
2025 Page 3 of 3
offenders on probation or parole, to offenders eligible for a reduction of term
pursuant to section 811 of this title, to offenders sentenced to serve an
interrupted sentence, to offenders sentenced for a felony after having been
previously convicted of a felony, or to offenders sentenced to life without
parole. Offenders currently serving a sentence shall be eligible to begin
earning a reduction in term when the earned time program becomes effective.
Notwithstanding this subdivision (1), when an offender has been convicted of a
disqualifying offense, the offender’s ability to participate and earn time in the
program shall be determined pursuant to subdivision (5) of this subsection.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380623 v.1